Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1587.09
Foreign judgments registered under prior law.

Sections 25-1587.01 to 25-1587.08 do not apply to foreign judgments registered prior to January 1, 1994, pursuant to sections 25-1587 to 25-15,104 as such sections existed immediately prior to such date. Sections 25-1587 to 25-15,104 shall remain effective on and after January 1, 1994, only for the purpose of enforcement of foreign judgments registered prior to such date pursuant to sections 25-1587 to 25-15,104 as such sections existed immediately prior to such date.

Laws 1993, LB 458, § 9.